Utah statutes.
63H-6-104.   Board of Directors -- Membership -- Term -- Quorum -- Vacancies.

(1)  The corporation is governed by a board of directors.

(2)  The board is composed of 11 members appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(3)  The governor shall ensure that:

(a)  two members of the board are residents of Salt Lake County in which the state fair is held;

(b)  there is at least one member of the board from each judicial district;

(c)  two members of the board are residents of the First Congressional District;

(d)  two members of the board are residents of the Second Congressional District;

(e)  two members of the board are residents of the Third Congressional District; and

(f)  two members of the board represent agricultural interests.

(4) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(a)(ii), the governor shall appoint board members to serve terms that expire on the December 1 four years after the year that the board member was appointed.

(ii)  In making appointments to the board, the governor shall ensure that the terms of approximately 1/4 of the board expire each year.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), board members serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

(c) (i)  If a board member is absent from three consecutive board meetings without excuse, that member's appointment is terminated, the position is vacant, and the governor shall appoint a replacement.

(ii)  The governor may remove any member of the board at will.

(d)  The governor shall fill any vacancy that occurs on the board for any reason by appointing a person according to the procedures of this section for the unexpired term of the vacated member.

(5)  The governor shall select the board's chair.

(6)  Six members of the board are a quorum for the transaction of business.

(7)  The board may elect a vice chair and any other board offices.

